Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,122
Denial of permit; procedures; appeal.

Before the State Fire Marshal denies an application for a permit, the affected person shall be given notice and opportunity for a hearing under procedures established by the State Fire Marshal. Upon receipt of the notification, any person aggrieved by the denial or revocation of a permit may request a hearing within ten days or the decision of the State Fire Marshal shall become final. When the State Fire Marshal has reason to believe that a permitholder's activities create an immediate threat to public safety, a permit may be suspended until the hearing process is complete. Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the State Fire Marshal may appeal such action, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1986, LB 217, § 6;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 178.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.